Louisiana, session 2026, HB199.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2116.1(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2116.1. Nursing facilities; facility need review; moratorium; exceptions
* * *
B.(1)(a) There shall be a moratorium on nursing facilities and additional
beds for nursing facilities which shall be in effect until July 1, 2027 July 1, 2031.
(b) The department shall collect and analyze data to assess the continued
necessity of the nursing facility moratorium.
(i) Beginning January 1, 2027, the department shall collect, at a minimum,
the following information monthly from all licensed hospitals in Louisiana:
(aa) The number of avoidable skilled nursing days occurring in hospitals.
(bb) An accounting of the reasons why such days were avoidable.
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2027, the department shall collect, at a minimum,
the following information monthly from all licensed nursing facilities in Louisiana:
(aa) The staffed licensed bed capacity of the nursing facility, as well as total
occupancy, delineated by payor source.
(bb) The number of denials or refusals to admit patients who are eligible for
nursing facility care and the reasons for any denials or refusals.
(c) The department may provide or mandate a template, form, or system for
the collection of information.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 199 ENROLLED
(d) The department shall submit the following reports to include the data
collected and analysis required pursuant to Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph to the
House and Senate committees on health and welfare:
(i) A quarterly report on the fifteenth of October, January, April, and July of
each year to include the data and analysis from the prior quarter. The first quarterly
report shall be submitted on April 15, 2027.
(ii) An annual report to include data and analysis from the prior calendar
year. The first annual report shall be submitted on March 1, 2028, and submitted
annually on March first of each subsequent year.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.